District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as “Condominium Insurance Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 310 of the Condominium Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law
1-89; D.C. Official Code § 42-1903.10), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (d-1) is amended to read as follows:
“(d-1)(1) Each unit owner shall, to the extent reasonably available, obtain and keep in full
force and effect, a condominium unit owner’s insurance policy. Such policy shall include:
(A) Dwelling or Building Property Coverage of not less than $25,000 or such
greater limit as is sufficient to repair and replace any improvements, betterments, alterations, and
additions made by the current owner or acquired from any previous owner other than the declarant, or
upgrades which are part of the unit when conveyed by the declarant, and which are the responsibility
of the unit owner to insure when required to do so by the condominium's declaration or bylaws;

(B) A limit of coverage adequate to repair or replace a unit owner’s existing
personal property;
(C) Personal liability coverage of not less than $500,000;
(D) A limit of additional living expense or loss of use coverage adequate to
provide alternative housing for at least 12 months in the event the unit owner cannot live in the unit
following a covered casualty event;
(E) Loss assessment coverage of not less than $25,000; and
(F) Coverage for the unit owners’ association’s property insurance deductible or
any portion thereof written in compliance with subsection (j)(2); provided, that the executive board
may increase the minimum amounts required under this subsection at a meeting properly noticed
under this chapter.
(2) All unit owner-obtained insurance policies shall contain a waiver of subrogation
with respect to the unit owners’ association and its policies.
(3) Each unit owner shall furnish evidence of insurance coverage to the unit owners’
Association annually, or more frequently if requested by the unit owners’ association. If a unit owner
fails to obtain and maintain individual unit owners’ coverage, the unit owners’ association shall have
the right to obtain a policy on behalf of the unit owner, with deductible proceeds payable to unit
owners’ association, and charge the annual premium cost to the unit owner as an assessment.
(2) Subsection (j) is amended to read as follows:
“(j)(1) The bylaws shall specify insurance coverage and limits with respect to any
insurance policy that may be required on the common elements.
“(2) If the cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion of the condominium
originates from a unit, the owner of the unit where the cause of the damage or destruction originates is


responsible for the unit owners’ association’s property insurance deductible, or uncovered loss, not to
exceed $25,000 (either in the aggregate or per unit), unless the governing documents allow for a
higher deductible amount or impose liability for a higher amount or the entirety of the loss. If the
cause of any damage to or destruction of any portion of the condominium originates from the common
elements or from outside the building, the association’s property insurance deductible shall be a
common expense. If a unit owner is responsible for the association's property insurance deductible or
an uncovered loss up to $25,000, this amount shall be assessed against the owner's unit. Regardless of
loss origination, if there is loss or damage that affects one or more units where the property policy
includes a per unit deductible, the owner of each damaged unit shall be responsible for the deductible
applied to that unit not to exceed $25,000.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October
16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).